vi: Loại máy xới đất: Răng trước; Răng xới giữa; Máy xới đất mini; Răng sau; Răng dọc; Khác
da: Kultivatortype: Frontspids; Mid-tine; Minikultivator; Bagspids; Lodret spids; Andet
fi: Kultivaattorin tyyppi: Etupiikit; Keskipiikkinen; Minikultivaattori; Takapiikki; Pystysuora piikki; Muu
pl: Typ kultywatora: Z zębami przednimi; Z zębami środkowymi; Mini glebogryzarka; Z zębami tylnymi; Z zębami pionowymi; Pozostałe
ru: Тип культиватора: С передним расположением фрез; С центральным расположением фрез; Мини-культиватор; С задним расположением фрез; С вертикальным расположением фрез; Другой
pt-BR: Tipo de cultivador: Dentes frontais; Eixo central; Mini cultivador; Dentes traseiros; Dente vertical; Outro
hu: Talajművelő eszköz típusa: Elülső kapatag; Középső kerekes; Mini kultivátor; Hátulsó kapatag; Függőleges kapatag; Egyéb
ja: 耕運機のタイプ: フロントタイン; ミッドタイン; ミニ耕運機; リアタイン; 垂直タイン; その他
el: Τύπος καλλιεργητή: Με μπροστινά δόντια; Με μεσαία φρέζα; Μίνι σύστημα καλλιέργειας; Πίσω δόντια; Κάθετα δόντια; Άλλο
zh-TW: 中耕機類型: 前置刀齒; 置中刀齒; 小型耕耘機; 後置刀齒; 垂直刀齒; 其他
es: Tipo de cultivador: Púas delanteras; Altura media; Mini cultivador; Dientes traseros; Púa vertical; Otros
lt-LT: Kultivatoriaus tipas: Priekinis dantis; Su viduriniais noragais; Mini kultivatorius; Galinis dantis; Vertikalus dantis; Kita
tr: Kültivatör tipi: Ön dişli; Orta diş; Mini kültivatör; Arka dişli; Dikey dişli; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de cultivator: Dinți frontali; Cu dinți centrali; Mini cultivator; Dinți spate; Dinți verticali; Altele
it: Tipo di motozappa: Denti frontali; Con frese centrali; Mini coltivatore; Denti posteriori; Denti verticali; Altro
nb: Kultivatortype: Front-tine; Midt-tind; Minikultivator; Bakre tind; Vertikal tind; Annet
de: Grubbertyp: Frontgrubber; Mittellange Zinken; Mini-Kultivator; Heckgrubber; Vertikalgrubber; Sonstiges
ko: 경운기 유형: 전방 타인형; 미드 타인; 미니 컬티베이터; 후방 타인형; 수직 타인형; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta kultivatora: Prednji; Srednji zupci; Mini kultivator; Stražnji; Vertikalni; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta kultivatorja: Sprednji zob; Srednji zob; Mini kultivator; Zadnji zob; Vertikalni zobje; Druga
th: ประเภทของเครื่องพรวนดิน: ซี่พรวนอยู่ด้านหน้าล้อ; ใบพรวนอยู่ตรงกลาง; รถไถพรวนขนาดเล็ก; ซี่พรวนอยู่ด้านหลังล้อ; ซี่พรวนแนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ kultivátoru: Radličky vpředu; Se středovým umístěním radliček/hrotů; Mini kultivátor; Radličky vzadu; Vertikální radličky; Jiné
fr: Type de cultivateur: Fraises avant; Binage moyen; Mini-motobineuse; Fraises arrière; Fraises verticales; Autre
zh-CN: 耕耘机类型: 前刀耕; 中齿; 微型耕耘机; 后刀耕; 立式刀耕; 其他
nl: Cultivatortype: Voortanden cultivator; Midden-tanden; Mini-cultivator; Achtertanden cultivator; Verticale-tanden cultivator; Overig
en: Cultivator type: Front-tine; Mid-tine; Mini cultivator; Rear-tine; Vertical-tine; Other
sk-SK: Typ kultivátora: S nožmi vpredu; So stredným zubom; Mini kultivátor; S nožmi vzadu; Vertikálne nože; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de cultivador: Dente frontal; Dentes médios; Mini cultivador; Dente traseiro; Dente vertical; Outro
sv: Kultivatortyp: Främre skänkel; Medellång tand; Minikultivator; Frammonterad jordfräs; Bakmonterad jordfräs; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип култиватор: С предни зъбци; Средни зъбци; Мини култиватор; Задни зъбци; Вертикални зъбци; Друго